testing/myv-tests-adj.yaml
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьседентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсесэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсестэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсевантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсевтементькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсешкантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсексэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетненьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнененьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнедеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнесэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнестэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнескак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Prl+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетневаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетневгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетневтемеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетнешкаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com+Clt/Гак: ашошкантьсетненеккак
